Connecticut, session 2026, SB00020.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subsection (a) of section 31-102 of the general statutes be
amended to increase the pay a member or alternate member receives for
each day during which such member is engaged in the duties of the
board from one hundred fifty dollars to three hundred dollars.